District of Columbia statutes.
1-1001.01

Election of electors.

In the District of Columbia electors of President and Vice President of the United States, the Delegate to the House of Representatives, the members of the State Board of Education, the members of the Council of the District of Columbia, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia, the Mayor and the following officials of political parties in the District of Columbia shall be elected as provided in this subchapter:

(1)

National committeemen and national committeewomen;

(2)

Delegates to conventions and conferences of political parties including delegates to nominate candidates for the Presidency and Vice Presidency of the United States;

(3)

Alternates to the officials referred to in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this section, where permitted by political party rules; and

(4)

Such members and officials of local committees of political parties as may be designated by the duly authorized local committees of such parties for election at large or by ward in the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 12, 1955, 69 Stat. 699, ch. 862, § 1
Oct. 4, 1961, 75 Stat. 817, Pub. L. 87-389, § 1(1)
Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 103, Pub. L. 90-292, § 4(1)
Sept. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 853, Pub. L. 91-405, title II, § 205(e)(1)
Dec. 23, 1971, 85 Stat. 788, Pub. L. 92-220, § 1(1)
Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 832, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 751(1)
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 2, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 2(a), 29 DCR 458
Oct. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-26, § 2(a), 54 DCR 8018
May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 131(a), 57 DCR 3012
Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-167, § 2(a), 61 DCR 10738

Cross References

Advisory neighborhood commissions, elections, authorization, see § 1-309.09.
Board of Elections and Ethics, fines and penalties, advisory opinions, see § 1-1103.05.
Council, elections, terms of office, vacancies, see § 1-204.01.
Elections, “political party” defined, see § 1-1101.01.
House of representatives, delegates, privileges and restrictions, qualifications, see § 1-401.
Statehood constitutional convention initiative, delegates, at-large and ward candidates, see § 1-124.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1001.08, § 1-1001.10, § 1-1161.01, § 1-1163.02, § 1-1163.05, § 1-1163.06, § 1-1163.16, § 1-1163.35, and § 38-2651.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1301.
1973 Ed., § 1-1101.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-26, in par. (2), deleted “: Provided, that all elections for delegates to conventions and conferences of political parties, upon the request of the said party, shall be scheduled at the same time as primary, general, or special elections already scheduled for other purposes” following “United States”.
D.C. Law 18-160, in the introductory language, inserted “the Attorney General for the District of Columbia,”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-167 substituted “State Board of Education” for “Board of Education” in the introductory paragraph.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Special Election Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-617, Jan. 28, 2015, 62 DCR 1908, 21 STAT 794).